District of Columbia statutes.
31-3523.01

Regulatory authority.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to diminish the authority of the Council to regulate the affairs of Group Hospitalization and Medical Services, Inc.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 24a
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(i), 56 DCR 1346